Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.380

Washington state legacy project, state library, and archives account.

The Washington state legacy project, state library, and archives account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 43.07.370 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the purposes of the Washington state legacy project under RCW 43.07.363, archives program under RCW 40.14.020, and the state library program under chapter 27.04 RCW. Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2008 c 222 s 13; 2003 c 164 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.